Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 3 Fiscal Retirement Bills

47-20-34.
Introduction of bill and preliminary consideration by committee.

Any retirement bill having a fiscal impact may be introduced in the General Assembly only during the regular session which is held during the first year of the term of office of members of the General Assembly. Any such retirement bill may be passed by the General Assembly only during the regular session which is held during the second year of the term of office of members of the General Assembly.

When a retirement bill having a fiscal impact is introduced, it shall be assigned by the presiding officer of the Senate or the House, as the case may be, to the respective Senate or House standing committee on retirement. If a majority of the total membership of the respective committee is opposed to the bill on its merits, no actuarial investigation provided for in Code Section 47-20-36 shall be necessary, and the bill shall not be reported out by the committee and shall not be adopted or considered by the House or Senate. If a majority of the committee wishes to consider the bill further and votes in favor of an actuarial investigation of the bill, an actuarial investigation shall be required as provided in Code Section 47-20-36. Except as otherwise provided by subsection (c) of this Code section, no retirement bill having a fiscal impact may be reported out of the committee to which it is assigned or may be considered or adopted by the House or Senate unless an actuarial investigation of the bill is made.

The committee to which a retirement bill having a fiscal impact is assigned following its introduction may at any time amend the bill to become a nonfiscal retirement bill. If the bill is so amended, an exact copy of the amended version shall be submitted by the chairman of the committee to the state auditor. If the state auditor issues a written certification that the committee amendment has converted the status of the bill to a nonfiscal retirement bill, the bill shall be a nonfiscal retirement bill for all purposes under this chapter as of the date of the state auditor’s certification. Only the committee to which a retirement bill having a fiscal impact is originally assigned following its introduction may convert the bill to a nonfiscal retirement bill as authorized in this subsection.

Any bill requiring a public retirement system to divest or refrain from investing in specific investments or classes of investments may only be introduced as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section and, in addition to the certification of the state auditor required by Code Section 47-20-32, such legislation shall be accompanied at the time of introduction by a statement from the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives describing the primary goal the bill is designed to achieve. Such bill shall also have attached at the time of introduction a fiscal analysis from each public retirement system affected stating the cost of compliance with the legislation and the anticipated annual fiscal losses which will be incurred as a result of complying with the legislation.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 353, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1094, § 3/SB 327.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added subsection (d).

47-20-35.
Perfection of bill by committee; actuarial investigation.

A retirement bill having a fiscal impact which the committee wishes to consider shall first be perfected, if necessary, by the committee. The committee may delay further consideration of the bill until after the close of the regular session during which the bill was introduced, but the committee shall complete its consideration of the bill for submission to the state auditor under Code Section 47-20-36 by not later than July 15 immediately following the close of the legislative session. The committee shall be authorized to meet for not more than five days, unless additional days are authorized by the President of the Senate for the Senate committee or by the Speaker of the House for the House committee, during the period beginning with the day following the close of the session and ending on July 1 immediately following the close of the session for the purpose of considering and perfecting the bill. If the bill originated in the Senate, the House Committee on Retirement shall be authorized to meet with the Senate Committee on Retirement to consider and perfect a bill during the period following the close of a regular session, and, if the bill originated in the House, the Senate Committee on Retirement shall have the same authority. The committees may adopt such procedures as they find appropriate for conducting meetings at which both committees are present as authorized by this subsection. For attending meetings of their respective committees as authorized by this subsection, the members of the Senate and House committees on retirement shall receive the expenses and allowances provided by law for members of legislative interim committees. If a retirement bill having a fiscal impact is changed by the committee to which it is assigned, such change shall be accomplished only by a substitute bill, and no committee amendment to the bill, except by substitute, shall be authorized.

Immediately after a retirement bill having a fiscal impact has been considered and perfected as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the chairman of the committee to which the bill was assigned shall transmit an exact copy of the bill, as perfected by the committee, when applicable, to the state auditor. The copy submitted to the state auditor shall bear an LC number. The submission of the bill to the state auditor shall have attached thereto a letter signed by the chairman of the committee requesting the state auditor to make or cause to be made an actuarial investigation on the bill.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-35

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 240, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 767, § 2.

47-20-36.
Scope of actuarial investigation; certificate and summary of investigation attached to bill.

If an actuarial investigation of a retirement bill having a fiscal impact is requested under Code Section 47-20-35, it shall be the duty of the state auditor to complete or cause to be completed such actuarial investigation by not later than November 1 of the same year during which the request for the actuarial investigation was made. The actuarial investigation shall include, but shall not be limited to, findings on the following factors as such factors are relevant to the retirement bill under consideration:

The dollar amount of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability which will result from the bill for the retirement system affected by the bill;

The dollar amount of the annual normal cost which will result from the bill for the retirement system affected by the bill;

A statement of the employer contribution rate currently in effect for the retirement system affected by the bill;

A statement of the employer contribution rate, which must be in conformity with the minimum funding standards specified by Code Section 47-20-10, recommended for the retirement system affected by the bill; and

A statement of the dollar amount of the increase in the annual employer contribution, if an existing retirement system is affected by the bill, or a statement of the total annual employer contribution, if a new retirement system is established by the bill, which will be necessary to maintain the retirement system affected or established by the bill in an actuarially sound condition.

By not later than November 1 of the same year that the request for an actuarial investigation was made, the completed actuarial investigation shall be submitted by the state auditor to the chairman of the committee who requested it along with a summary of the actuarial investigation which shall include the relevant findings specified in subsection (a) of this Code section.

The chairman of the committee, upon receipt of the information provided for under subsection (b) of this Code section, shall cause the summary of the actuarial investigation to be printed by the Secretary of the Senate or the Clerk of the House of Representatives, depending on whether the bill is a Senate bill or House bill, in sufficient quantity to attach a copy thereof to all printed copies of the bill. The original summary of the actuarial investigation shall be attached by the Secretary of the Senate or Clerk of the House of Representatives to the original version of the substitute bill, as perfected by the committee under Code Section 47-20-35, if applicable, or to the original version of the bill as introduced if the bill was not changed by the committee prior to its submission to the state auditor for an actuarial investigation.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-36

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 240, § 5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 767, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, the word “of” was deleted following “original” the first time such word appears in the second sentence of subsection (c).

47-20-37.
Consideration of bill on the floor; approval of amendments by state auditor; effect of passing bill in violation of this article.

When a retirement bill having a fiscal impact has had an actuarial investigation pursuant to Code Section 47-20-36, the bill may be considered at the next regular session of the General Assembly. If the bill as originally introduced was not changed by the committee and the original version was submitted to the state auditor for an actuarial investigation, then the original version of the bill is the only one, except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of this Code section, which may be considered by any committee or by the House or Senate. If the original bill was substituted by the committee and the substitute version was the one submitted to the state auditor, then that substitute bill is the only one, except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of this Code section, which may be considered by any committee or by the House or Senate.

After completion of an actuarial investigation, any amendment to a retirement bill having a fiscal impact shall be out of order and shall not be allowed either by a committee or by the House or Senate, except for a nonfiscal or a reduction in cost amendment. Any amendment to a retirement bill having a fiscal impact shall be submitted to the state auditor by the chairperson of the committee, if a committee amendment, or by the presiding officer of the Senate or House if the amendment was made by the Senate or House. If the state auditor certifies in writing that the amendment is a nonfiscal amendment or if the amendment results in a reduction in cost and the state auditor provides an actuarial investigation as required in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36, then the bill as amended, with the state auditor’s certification or actuarial investigation attached to the original of the amendment, may continue in the legislative process. If the state auditor will not issue such a certification for the amendment or if there is no actuarial study showing the reduced cost of the amendment, the bill’s progress in the legislative process will end, and the bill shall not be considered further by either the House or Senate and, if passed by the General Assembly, the bill shall not become law and shall stand repealed in its entirety on the first day of July immediately following its enactment.

An amendment to a retirement bill having a fiscal impact which is prohibited by subsection (b) of this Code section may be withdrawn by the committee which made the amendment, if a committee amendment, or by the Senate, if that body made the amendment, or by the House, if that body made the amendment. If the amendment is withdrawn, the bill may continue in the legislative process as any other bill, unless it is subsequently amended, and, in that event, this Code section shall apply to the subsequent amendment.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-37

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 240, § 6; Ga. L. 1995, p. 331, § 1.